Florida, session 2026, SB1628.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âSection 377.817, Florida Statutes, is created to 26 read: 27 377.817âNet-zero and carbon policies, expenditures, taxes, 28 assessments, or trade programs; prohibition.â 29 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 30 (a)ââBusiness activityâ means any activity or series of 31 activities that: 32 1.âInvolve the emission of a greenhouse gas or a 33 combination thereof; and 34 2.âForm a single undertaking or enterprise with regard to 35 any relevant circumstances. 36 (b)ââCarbon dioxideâ means a naturally occurring gas 37 composed of one carbon atom and two oxygen atoms that occurs as 38 a byproduct of burning fossil fuels, such as oil, gas, or coal; 39 a byproduct of burning biomass; a byproduct of land use changes; 40 or a byproduct of industrial processes. 41 (c)ââCarbon dioxide equivalent emissionsâ means the number 42 of metric tons of carbon dioxide emissions with the same global 43 warming potential as one metric ton of another greenhouse gas. 44 (d)ââCarbon-intensive activityâ means any business activity 45 or other activity performed by a person which supports any of 46 the following: 47 1.âThe movement of people or goods through methods of 48 transportation, including automobiles, commercial vehicles, 49 freight haulers, aircraft, vessels, pipelines, delivery devices, 50 and similar methods, and the use of energy resources to power or 51 operate such transportation methods. 52 2.âThe creation or transmission of energy resources for the 53 following commercial and residential uses: electricity; 54 manufacturing; sustaining human life, including refrigeration 55 and cooling in enclosed or partially enclosed spaces; waste 56 management; or the operation or manufacturing of appliances for 57 human use. 58 3.âThe performance of activities to support the production 59 of a carbon-intensive product, including farming, agriculture, 60 hunting and gathering, or the taking of fish and wildlife to 61 sustain human life. 62 4.âThe operation or purchase of a vessel for transporting a 63 person or an object by use of an energy source. 64 5.âThe use of methods authorized by authorities to take 65 fish and wildlife resources. 66 6.âThe mining, exploration, or manufacturing of products to 67 support the continued livelihood of mankind. 68 (e)ââCarbon-intensive productâ means any of the following, 69 including a product containing a component of such: 70 1.âProducts containing iron; steel; steel mill products, 71 including pipe and tube; aluminum; cement; glass, including 72 flat, container, and specialty glass and fiberglass; oil or a 73 component thereof; minerals and metals; pulp; and paper. 74 2.âAn agricultural commodity or product, whether raw or 75 processed, including a commodity or product derived from 76 livestock which is marketed in the United States for human or 77 livestock consumption. The term also includes agricultural, 78 aquacultural, horticultural, viticultural, and dairy products; 79 livestock and the products thereof; the products of poultry and 80 bee raising; the edible products of forestry; and products 81 raised or produced on farms and the processed or manufactured 82 products thereof transported or intended to be transported in 83 interstate or foreign commerce. 84 (f)ââEmissionsâ means the release of greenhouse gases into 85 the atmosphere or air by a person. 86 (g)Â âGovernmental entityâ means the state or any political 87 subdivision thereof, including the executive, legislative, and 88 judicial branches of government; the independent establishments 89 of the state, counties, municipalities, districts, authorities, 90 boards, or commissions; and any agencies subject to this 91 chapter. The term also includes community development districts, 92 improvement districts, and homeownersâ associations. 93 (h)ââGovernment fundsâ means state funds, as that term is 94 described in s. 215.31, and any moneys of the state or of any 95 Florida College System institution or state university, county, 96 school district, political subdivision, special district, 97 metropolitan government, or municipality, including agencies, 98 boards, bureaus, commissions, and institutions of any of the 99 foregoing, or of any court, and includes the moneys of all 100 county officers, including constitutional officers. 101 (i)ââGreenhouse gasâ means any of the following gases: 102 carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, 103 perfluorocarbons, sulfur hexafluoride, or nitrogen trifluoride. 104 (j)ââNet-zero policyâ means any target, threshold, 105 initiative, action, framework, requirement, or policy related to 106 reducing the use of a carbon-intensive product or activity, 107 including: 108 1.âA requirement imposed by a governmental entity which 109 requires the governmental entity to meet a statewide, regional, 110 or geographically specific reduction in carbon dioxide or 111 greenhouse gas emissions equal to zero or when annual 112 anthropogenic emissions of greenhouse gases or carbon dioxide 113 equivalent emissions to the atmosphere are balanced by removals 114 over a specific period. 115 2.âA requirement imposed by a governmental entity which 116 requires a person or business activity, including a carbon 117 intensive activity, to do any of the following: 118 a.âMeet a specific reduction in greenhouse gas or carbon 119 dioxide equivalent emissions equal to zero or when annual 120 anthropogenic emissions of greenhouse gases into the atmosphere 121 are balanced by removals over a specific period. 122 b.âMeet any goal of the Paris Agreement, defined as the 123 resolution adopted by the United Nations Framework Convention on 124 Climate Changeâs 21st Conference of the Parties in Paris, 125 France; or any similar initiative adopted by the Federal 126 Government or any geopolitical organization affiliated with the 127 World Bank or World Economic Forum related to such. 128 c.âSupport the goal of a regional governing authority or 129 multistate entity that commits to a reduction in greenhouse gas 130 emissions equal to zero or when annual anthropogenic emissions 131 of greenhouse gases to the atmosphere are balanced by removals 132 over a specific period. 133 d.âRestrict a carbon-intensive activity from which a person 134 would not otherwise be restricted, for the sole purpose of 135 meeting a net-zero policy. This may not be construed to legalize 136 an otherwise illegal action by a person. 137 e.âProhibit the use, sale, purchase, or exchange of a 138 carbon-intensive product or carbon for the sole purpose of 139 meeting a net-zero policy. This may not be construed to legalize 140 an otherwise illegal action by a person. 141 (2)âDECLARATION OF POLICY.âThe Legislature finds that net 142 zero policies, carbon taxes and assessments, and carbon 143 emissions trading programs, commonly known as âcap-and-tradeâ or 144 âcap-and-taxâ programs, are detrimental to the stateâs energy 145 security and economic interests. It is the policy of this state 146 to govern under the energy policy outlined in s. 377.601 and to 147 prohibit the adoption or implementation of a net-zero policy by 148 a governmental entity in any way, including through government 149 expenditures, taxes, assessments, or carbon emissions trading 150 programs. 151 (3)âPROHIBITED POLICIES.âA governmental entity may not 152 adopt, or require a person to adopt, a net-zero policy. This 153 prohibition includes references to or the inclusion of such 154 policies in comprehensive plans, land development regulations, 155 transportation plans, or any published or adopted government 156 policy or procedure. 157 (4)âPROHIBITED EXPENDITURES.âA governmental entity may not 158 expend government funds to a person in a manner that supports, 159 implements, or advances a net-zero policy, including by doing 160 any of the following: 161 (a)âProviding procurement or purchasing preferences for 162 non-carbon-intensive products. 163 (b)âInstituting purchasing preferences for passenger 164 vehicles, commercial vehicles, or heavy equipment based solely 165 on the fuel source of such vehicles or equipment. 166 (c)âExpending government funds to pay dues for a 167 nongovernmental organization, including a trade association or 168 league of government entities, that has adopted or supports a 169 net-zero policy. 170 (5)âPROHIBITED TAXATION AND ASSESSMENTS.âA governmental 171 entity may not impose a tax, a fee, a penalty, a charge, an 172 offset, or an assessment to advance a net-zero policy. This 173 includes, but shall not be limited to, a tax, a fee, a penalty, 174 a charge, an offset, or an assessment on any of the following: 175 (a)âThe carbon content of a fuel. 176 (b)âThe emission of carbon dioxide or other greenhouse gas 177 which results from the use, production, or consumption of a good 178 or service. 179 (c)âA carbon-intensive activity. 180 (d)âThe use, sale, purchase, or exchange of a carbon 181 intensive product or carbon-intensive activity to advance a net 182 zero policy. 183 (6)âPROHIBITED CAP-AND-TRADE PROGRAMS.âA governmental 184 entity may not implement, administer, or enforce a program that 185 has the effect of doing any of the following: 186 (a)âEstablishing a statewide, regional, or geographic 187 specific limit or cap on the amount of emissions of carbon 188 dioxide or other greenhouse gas which result from the use, 189 production, or consumption of a carbon-intensive product or 190 carbon-intensive activity. 191 (b)âProviding for the allocation, auction, or transfer of 192 emissions allowances or credits among pollutant sources as a 193 means of compliance with emissions limits. 194 (c)âRequiring a governmental entity or a person within this 195 state to participate in a carbon emissions trading program. 196 (7)âAFFIDAVIT.âBeginning January 1, 2027, the Department of 197 Environmental Protection shall annually require all governmental 198 entities to submit an affidavit signed under penalty of perjury 199 by an authorized official of the governmental entity attesting 200 compliance with this section. 201 (8)âAPPLICABILITY.âThis section applies to a proposed 202 action by a governmental entity on or after July 1, 2026, which 203 is otherwise not allowable by law. 204 Section 2.âParagraphs (g), (h), and (r) of subsection (1) 205 of section 125.01, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 206 125.01âPowers and duties.â 207 (1)âThe legislative and governing body of a county shall 208 have the power to carry on county government. To the extent not 209 inconsistent with general or special law, this power includes, 210 but is not restricted to, the power to: 211 (g)âPrepare and enforce comprehensive plans for the 212 development of the county. Such plans must comply with s. 213 377.817. 214 (h)âEstablish, coordinate, and enforce zoning and such 215 business regulations as are necessary for the protection of the 216 public. Such zoning and business regulations must comply with s. 217 377.817. 218 (r)âExcept as prohibited in s. 377.817, levy and collect 219 taxes, both for county purposes and for the providing of 220 municipal services within any municipal service taxing unit, and 221 special assessments; borrow and expend money; and issue bonds, 222 revenue certificates, and other obligations of indebtedness, 223 which power shall be exercised in such manner, and subject to 224 such limitations, as may be provided by general law. There shall 225 be no referendum required for the levy by a county of ad valorem 226 taxes, both for county purposes and for the providing of 227 municipal services within any municipal service taxing unit. 228 1.âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, a county may 229 not levy special assessments on lands classified as agricultural 230 lands under s. 193.461 unless the revenue from such assessments 231 has been pledged for debt service and is necessary to meet 232 obligations of bonds or certificates issued by the county which 233 remain outstanding on July 1, 2023, including refundings thereof 234 for debt service savings where the maturity of the debt is not 235 extended. For bonds or certificates issued after July 1, 2023, 236 special assessments securing such bonds may not be levied on 237 lands classified as agricultural under s. 193.461. 238 2.âThe provisions of Subparagraph 1. does do not apply to 239 residential structures and their curtilage. 240 Section 3.âSubsection (2) of section 166.021, Florida 241 Statutes, is amended to read: 242 166.021âPowers.â 243 (2)ââMunicipal purposeâ means any activity or power which 244 may be exercised by the state or its political subdivisions. The 245 term does not include the prohibitions listed in s. 377.817. 246 Section 4.âSection 166.201, Florida Statutes, is amended to 247 read: 248 166.201âTaxes and charges.âExcept as prohibited in s. 249 377.817, a municipality may raise, by taxation and licenses 250 authorized by the constitution or general law, or by user 251 charges or fees authorized by ordinance, amounts of money which 252 are necessary for the conduct of municipal government and may 253 enforce their receipt and collection in the manner prescribed by 254 ordinance not inconsistent with law. 255 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.